LEXC/clipboard.txt
LEXICON Verbs
Verb_Root ;
< 0:{nag} "@U.VOICE.ACTOR@" > Verb_Root ;
< 0:{naga} "@U.VOICE.ACTOR@" > Verb_Root ;
< 0:{mag} "@U.VOICE.ACTOR@" > Verb_Root ;
< 0:{maga} "@U.VOICE.ACTOR@" > Verb_Root ;
< 0:{gin} "@U.VOICE.OBJECT@" > Verb_Root ;
< 0:{gina} "@U.VOICE.OBJECT@" > Verb_Root ;
< 0:{paga} "@U.VOICE.OBJECT@" > Verb_Root ;
< 0:{gin} "@U.VOICE.INSTRUMENTAL@" > Verb_Root ;
< 0:{gina} "@U.VOICE.INSTRUMENTAL@" > Verb_Root ;
< 0:{i} "@U.VOICE.INSTRUMENTAL@" > Verb_Root ;
< 0:{iga} "@U.VOICE.INSTRUMENTAL@" > Verb_Root ;
< 0:{gin} "@U.VOICE.RECIPIENT@" > Verb_Root ;
< 0:{gina} "@U.VOICE.RECIPIENT@" > Verb_Root ;
< 0:{paga} "@U.VOICE.RECIPIENT@" > Verb_Root ;



LEXICON Verbs
Verb_Root ;
@U.VOICE.ACTOR@ Actor_Voice ;
@U.VOICE.OBJECT@ Object_Voice ;
@U.VOICE.INSTRUMENTAL@ Instrumental_Voice ;
@U.VOICE.RECIPIENT@ Recipient_Voice ;

LEXICON Actor_Voice
< 0:{nag} "@U.ASPECT.PFV@" > Verb_Root ;
< 0:{naga} "@U.ASPECT.CONT@" > Verb_Root ;
< 0:{mag} "@U.ASPECT.CTPL@" > Verb_Root ;
< 0:{maga} "@U.ASPECT.CTPLCONT@" > Verb_Root ;

LEXICON Object_Voice
< 0:{gin} "@U.ASPECT.PFV@" > Verb_Root ;
< 0:{gina} "@U.ASPECT.CONT@" > Verb_Root ;
< 0:{paga} "@U.ASPECT.CTPLCONT@" > Verb_Root ;

LEXICON Instrumental_Voice
< 0:{gin} "@U.ASPECT.PFV@" > Verb_Root ;
< 0:{gina} "@U.ASPECT.CONT@" > Verb_Root ;
< 0:{i} "@U.ASPECT.CTPL@" > Verb_Root ;
< 0:{iga} "@U.ASPECT.CTPLCONT@" > Verb_Root ;

LEXICON Recipient_Voice
< 0:{gin} "@U.ASPECT.PFV@" > Verb_Root ;
< 0:{gina} "@U.ASPECT.CONT@" > Verb_Root ;
< 0:{paga} "@U.ASPECT.CTPLCONT@" > Verb_Root ;





!!One that kinda works

LEXICON Verbs
Verb_Root ;
@U.VOICE.ACTOR@:@U.VOICE.ACTOR@ Actor_Voice ;
@U.VOICE.OBJECT@:@U.VOICE.OBJECT@ Object_Voice ;
@U.VOICE.INSTRUMENTAL@:@U.VOICE.INSTRUMENTAL@ Instrumental_Voice ;
@U.VOICE.RECIPIENT@:@U.VOICE.RECIPIENT@ Recipient_Voice ;

LEXICON Actor_Voice
< 0:{nag} "@U.ASPECT.PFV@" > Verb_Root ;
< 0:{naga} "@U.ASPECT.CONT@" > Verb_Root ;
< 0:{mag} "@U.ASPECT.CTPL@" > Verb_Root ;
< 0:{maga} "@U.ASPECT.CTPLCONT@" > Verb_Root ;

LEXICON Object_Voice
< 0:{gin} "@U.ASPECT.PFV@" > Verb_Root ;
< 0:{gina} "@U.ASPECT.CONT@" > Verb_Root ;
< 0:{paga} "@U.ASPECT.CTPLCONT@" > Verb_Root ;

LEXICON Instrumental_Voice
< 0:{gin} "@U.ASPECT.PFV@" > Verb_Root ;
< 0:{gina} "@U.ASPECT.CONT@" > Verb_Root ;
< 0:{i} "@U.ASPECT.CTPL@" > Verb_Root ;
< 0:{iga} "@U.ASPECT.CTPLCONT@" > Verb_Root ;

LEXICON Recipient_Voice
< 0:{gin} "@U.ASPECT.PFV@" > Verb_Root ;
< 0:{gina} "@U.ASPECT.CONT@" > Verb_Root ;
< 0:{paga} "@U.ASPECT.CTPLCONT@" > Verb_Root ;

LEXICON Verb_Root
hambal V "speak" ;
basa V "read" ;
tudlo V "teach" ;

LEXICON V
+V+Ind Voice_Suffixes ;
+V+Imp: Imperative ;
@U.VOICE.ACTOR@+V+Ind+ActV:@U.VOICE.ACTOR@ Aspect_Tags ;
@U.VOICE.OBJECT@+V+Ind+ObjV:@U.VOICE.OBJECT@ Aspect_Tags ;
@U.VOICE.INSTRUMENTAL@+V+Ind+InsV:@U.VOICE.INSTRUMENTAL@ Aspect_Tags ;
@U.VOICE.RECIPIENT@+V+Ind+RecV:@U.VOICE.RECIPIENT@ Aspect_Tags ;

LEXICON Aspect_Tags
@U.ASPECT.PFV@+Pfv:@U.ASPECT.PFV@ Voice_Suffixes ;
@U.ASPECT.CONT@+Cont:@U.ASPECT.CONT@ Voice_Suffixes ;
@U.ASPECT.CTPL@+Ctpl:@U.ASPECT.CTPL@ Voice_Suffixes ;
@U.ASPECT.CTPLCONT@+Ctpl+Cont:@U.ASPECT.CTPLCONT@ Voice_Suffixes ;

LEXICON Imperative
@U.VOICE.OFF@+ObjV:@U.VOICE.OFF@%>a # ;
@U.VOICE.OFF@+RecV:@U.VOICE.OFF@%>i # ;

LEXICON Voice_Suffixes
@U.VOICE.OFF@+ObjV+Ctpl:@U.VOICE.OFF@%>on # ; !TODO Write rule to change morpheme boundary to h before vowel initial suffixes
@U.VOICE.OFF@+RecV+Ctpl:@U.VOICE.OFF@%>an # ;
@U.VOICE.ACTOR@:@U.VOICE.ACTOR@ V2 ;
@U.VOICE.OBJECT@+Ctpl:@U.VOICE.OBJECT@%>on # ;
@U.VOICE.INSTRUMENTAL@:@U.VOICE.INSTRUMENTAL@ # ;
@U.VOICE.RECIPIENT@+Ctpl:@U.VOICE.RECIPIENT@%>an # ;

LEXICON V2
+Recip:%>anay # ;





!Turned in Version
LEXICON Verbs
< 0:{nag} "@U.VOICE.ACTOR1@" > Verb_Root ;
< 0:{naga} "@U.VOICE.ACTOR2@" > Verb_Root ;
< 0:{mag} "@U.VOICE.ACTOR3@" > Verb_Root ;
< 0:{maga} "@U.VOICE.ACTOR4@" > Verb_Root ;
< 0:{gin} "@U.VOICE.OBJECT1@" > Verb_Root ;
< 0:{gina} "@U.VOICE.OBJECT2@" > Verb_Root ;
< 0:0 "@U.VOICE.OBJECT3@" > Verb_Root ;
< 0:{paga} "@U.VOICE.OBJECT4@" > Verb_Root ;
< 0:{gin} "@U.VOICE.INSTRUMENTAL1@" > Verb_Root ;
< 0:{gina} "@U.VOICE.INSTRUMENTAL2@" > Verb_Root ;
< 0:{i} "@U.VOICE.INSTRUMENTAL3@" > Verb_Root ;
< 0:{iga} "@U.VOICE.INSTRUMENTAL4@" > Verb_Root ;
< 0:{gin} "@U.VOICE.RECIPIENT1@" > Verb_Root ;
< 0:{gina} "@U.VOICE.RECIPIENT2@" > Verb_Root ;
< 0:0 "@U.VOICE.RECIPIENT3@" > Verb_Root ;
< 0:{paga} "@U.VOICE.RECIPIENT4@" > Verb_Root ;

LEXICON Verb_Root
hambal V "speak" ;
basa V "read" ;

LEXICON V
@U.VOICE.ACTOR1@+V+Ind+ActV+Pfv:@U.VOICE.ACTOR1@ # ;
@U.VOICE.ACTOR2@+V+Ind+ActV+Cont:@U.VOICE.ACTOR2@ # ;
@U.VOICE.ACTOR3@+V+Ind+ActV+Ctpl:@U.VOICE.ACTOR3@ # ;
@U.VOICE.ACTOR4@+V+Ind+ActV+Ctpl+Cont:@U.VOICE.ACTOR4@ # ;
@U.VOICE.OBJECT1@+V+Ind+ObjV+Pfv:@U.VOICE.OBJECT1@ # ;
@U.VOICE.OBJECT2@+V+Ind+ObjV+Cont:@U.VOICE.OBJECT2@ # ;
@U.VOICE.OBJECT3@+V+Ind+ObjV+Ctpl:@U.VOICE.OBJECT3@%>on # ;
@U.VOICE.OBJECT4@+V+Ind+ObjV+Ctpl+Cont:@U.VOICE.OBJECT4@%>on # ;
@U.VOICE.INSTRUMENTAL1@+V+Ind+InsV+Pfv:@U.VOICE.INSTRUMENTAL1@ # ;
@U.VOICE.INSTRUMENTAL2@+V+Ind+InsV+Cont:@U.VOICE.INSTRUMENTAL2@ # ;
@U.VOICE.INSTRUMENTAL3@+V+Ind+InsV+Ctpl:@U.VOICE.INSTRUMENTAL3@ # ;
@U.VOICE.INSTRUMENTAL4@+V+Ind+InsV+Ctpl+Cont:@U.VOICE.INSTRUMENTAL4@ # ;
@U.VOICE.RECIPIENT1@+V+Ind+RecV+Pfv:@U.VOICE.RECIPIENT1@%>an # ;
@U.VOICE.RECIPIENT2@+V+Ind+RecV+Cont:@U.VOICE.RECIPIENT2@%>an # ;
@U.VOICE.RECIPIENT3@+V+Ind+RecV+Ctpl:@U.VOICE.RECIPIENT3@%>an # ;
@U.VOICE.RECIPIENT4@+V+Ind+RecV+Ctpl+Cont:@U.VOICE.RECIPIENT4@%>an # ;

!!€ hambal:    hambal+V+Ind+ActV+Pfv
!!€ hambal:    hambal+V+Ind+ActV+Cont
!!€ hambal:    hambal+V+Ind+ActV+Ctpl
!!€ hambal:    hambal+V+Ind+ActV+Ctpl+Cont
!!€ hambal:    hambal+V+Ind+ObjV+Pfv
!!€ hambal:    hambal+V+Ind+ObjV+Cont
!!€ hambal:    hambal+V+Ind+ObjV+Ctpl
!!€ hambal:    hambal+V+Ind+ObjV+Ctpl+Cont
!!€ hambal:    hambal+V+Ind+InsV+Pfv
!!€ hambal:    hambal+V+Ind+InsV+Cont
!!€ hambal:    hambal+V+Ind+InsV+Ctpl
!!€ hambal:    hambal+V+Ind+InsV+Ctpl+Cont
!!€ hambal:    hambal+V+Ind+RecV+Pfv
!!€ hambal:    hambal+V+Ind+RecV+Cont
!!€ hambal:    hambal+V+Ind+RecV+Ctpl
!!€ hambal:    hambal+V+Ind+RecV+Ctpl+Cont

!!$ hambal:    hambal+V+Ind+ActV+ObjV+Ctpl
!!$ hambal:    hambal+V+Ind+ActV+InsV+Ctpl
!!$ hambal:    hambal+V+Ind+ActV+RecV+Ctpl
!!$ hambal:    hambal+V+Ind+ObjV+InsV+Ctpl
!!$ hambal:    hambal+V+Ind+ObjV+RecV+Ctpl
!!$ hambal:    hambal+V+Ind+InsV+RecV+Ctpl
!!$ hambal:    hambal+V+Ind+ActV+Pfv+Cont
!!$ hambal:    hambal+V+Ind+ActV+Pfv+Ctpl
!!$ hambal:    hambal+V+Ind+ObjV+Pfv+Cont
!!$ hambal:    hambal+V+Ind+ObjV+Pfv+Ctpl
!!$ hambal:    hambal+V+Ind+InsV+Pfv+Cont
!!$ hambal:    hambal+V+Ind+InsV+Pfv+Ctpl
!!$ hambal:    hambal+V+Ind+RecV+Pfv+Cont
!!$ hambal:    hambal+V+Ind+RecV+Pfv+Ctpl
